Missouri, session 2026, HB2620.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 143.175, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 143.175, to read as follows:
143.175. 1. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, for purposes of
calculating the Missouri taxable income as required under section 143.011, a percentage of
the income received by any person as salary or compensation:
(1) In performance of inactive duty for training (IDT) of the National Guard or annual
training status (AT) of the National Guard;
(2) In reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United States; [or]
(3) For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, in the form of a bonus
from the National Guard or a reserve component of the United States Armed Forces for
joining, reenlisting, or for any other reason; or
(4) For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, in performance of
state-funded military orders of the National Guard, commonly known as state active
duty (SAD) or state emergency duty (SED);

and to the extent that such income is included in the federal adjusted gross income, may be
deducted from the taxpayer's Missouri adjusted gross income to determine such taxpayer's
Missouri taxable income. If such person files a combined return with a spouse, a percentage
of any military income received while engaging in the performance of National Guard or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2620 2
reserve military duty may be deducted from their Missouri combined adjusted gross income.
Such military income shall be deducted as follows:
(a) For the tax year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, twenty percent of such
military income;
(b) For the tax year beginning on or after January 1, 2021, forty percent of such
military income;
(c) For the tax year beginning on or after January 1, 2022, sixty percent of such
income;
(d) For the tax year beginning on or after January 1, 2023, eighty percent of such
income;
(e) For all tax years beginning on January 1, 2024, and thereafter, one hundred
percent of such income.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or any other provision of law to the
contrary, the deduction authorized by this section shall not apply to compensation received
while engaging in civilian federal service, including civil service positions requiring the
wearing of military uniform and military affiliation.
✔